Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-412.01
Electric system; contract to operate; bidding requirements.

Whenever any city or village in this state contracts with a public power district or an agency of the United States Government to operate, renew, replace, and add to the electric distribution, transmission, or generation system of the city or village and in the performance of the contract the public power district or the United States Government agrees to comply with the laws relating to bidding for contracts entered into by public power districts or the United States Government, the city or village shall not be required to advertise for or take bids for such renewals, replacements, or additions.

Laws 1969, c. 78, § 3, p. 410;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 1.